Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1

General Provisions

65-4-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Competing telecommunications service provider” means any individual or entity that offers or provides any two-way communications service, telephone service, telegraph service, paging service, or communications service similar to such services and is certificated as a provider of such services after June 6, 1995, unless otherwise exempted from this definition by state or federal law;

“Current authorized fair rate of return” means:

For an incumbent local exchange telephone company operating pursuant to a regulatory reform plan ordered by the former public service commission under TPSC rule 1220-4-2-.55, any return within the range contemplated by TPSC rule 1220-4-2-.55(1)(c)(1) or TPSC rule 1220-4-2-.55(d);

For any other incumbent local exchange telephone company, the rate of return on rate base most recently used by the former public service commission in an order evaluating its rates;

“Gross domestic product-price index (GDP-PI)” used to determine limits on rate changes means the final estimate of the chain-weighted gross domestic product-price index as prepared by the United States department of commerce and published in the Survey of Current Business, or its successor;

“Incumbent local exchange telephone company” means a public utility offering and providing basic local exchange telephone service as defined by § 65-5-108(a) pursuant to tariffs approved by the former public service commission prior to June 6, 1995;

“Interconnection services” means telecommunications services, including intrastate switched access service, that allow a telecommunications service provider to interconnect with the networks of all other telecommunications service providers;

“Public utility” means every individual, copartnership, association, corporation, or joint stock company, its lessees, trustees, or receivers, appointed by any court whatsoever, that own, operate, manage or control, within the state, any interurban electric railway, traction company, all other common carriers, express, gas, electric light, heat, power, water, telephone, telegraph, telecommunications services, or any other like system, plant or equipment, affected by and dedicated to the public use, under privileges, franchises, licenses, or agreements, granted by the state or by any political subdivision thereof. “Public utility” as defined in this section shall not be construed to include the following nonutilities:

Any corporation owned by or any agency or instrumentality of the United States;

Any county, municipal corporation or other subdivision of the state of Tennessee;

Any corporation owned by or any agency or instrumentality of the state;

Any corporation or joint stock company more than fifty percent (50%) of the voting stock or shares of which is owned by the United States, the state of Tennessee or by any nonutility referred to in subdivisions (a)(1), (2), and (3);

Any cooperative organization not organized or doing business for profit, cooperative association not organized or doing business for profit, or cooperative corporation not organized or doing business for profit. For purposes of this subdivision (6)(A)(v), “cooperative” shall mean only those nonprofit cooperative entities organized under or otherwise subject to the Rural Electric and Community Services Cooperative Act, compiled in chapter 25, part 2 of this title, or the Telephone Cooperative Act, compiled in chapter 29 of this title.

Any individual, partnership, copartnership, association, corporation or joint stock company offering domestic public cellular radio telephone service authorized by the federal communications commission; provided, that the real and personal property of such domestic public cellular radio telephone entities shall be assessed by the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to §§ 67-5-801(a)(1), 67-5-901(a)(1), and § 67-5-1301(a)(2); provided, however, that until at least two (2) entities, each independent of the other, are authorized by the federal communications commission to offer domestic public cellular radio telephone service in the same cellular geographical area within the state, the customer rates only of a company offering domestic public cellular radio telephone service shall be subject to review by the Tennessee public utility commission pursuant to §§ 65-5-101 — 65-5-104. Upon existence in a cellular geographical area of the conditions set forth in the preceding sentence, domestic public cellular radio telephone service in such area, for all purposes, shall automatically cease to be treated as a public utility under this title. The Tennessee public utility commission's authority over domestic public cellular radio telephone service is expressly limited to the above extent and the commission shall have no authority over resellers of domestic public cellular radio telephone service. For the purpose of this subdivision (6)(A)(vi), “authorized” means six (6) months after granting of the construction permit by the federal communications commission to the second entity or when the second entity begins offering service in the same cellular geographical area, whichever should first occur. This subdivision (6)(A)(vi) does not affect, modify or lessen the utility commission's authority over public utilities that are subject to regulation pursuant to chapter 5 of this title;

Any county, municipal corporation or other subdivision of a state bordering Tennessee, but only to the extent that such county, municipal corporation or other subdivision distributes natural gas to retail customers within the municipal boundaries and/or urban growth boundaries of a Tennessee city or town adjoining such bordering state;

Any of the foregoing nonutilities acting jointly or in combination or through a joint agency or instrumentality; and

For purposes of §§ 65-5-101 and 65-5-103, “public utility” shall not include interexchange carriers. “Interexchange carriers” means companies, other than incumbent local exchange telephone companies, owning facilities in the state which consist of network elements and switches, or other communication transmission equipment used to carry voice, data, image, and video traffic across the local access and transport area (LATA) boundaries within Tennessee;

“Public utility” does not mean nonprofit homeowners associations or organizations whose membership is limited to owners of lots in residential subdivisions, which associations or organizations own, construct, operate or maintain water, street light or park maintenance service systems for the exclusive use of that subdivision; provided, however, that the subdivisions are unable to obtain such services from the local utility district. None of the property, property rights or facilities owned or used by the association or organization for the rendering of such services shall be under the jurisdiction, supervision or control of the Tennessee public utility commission;

“Public utility” does not mean any nonprofit corporation, as defined in § 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(4)), which owns and operates a wastewater system primarily for the use of the members of the corporation and which has received a written statement of exemption from regulation as a public utility from the Tennessee public utility commission prior to January 1, 2009;

“Public utility” includes a wind energy facility, as defined in § 65-17-101, and does not include a wind energy facility subject to § 65-17-102; and

“Telecommunications service provider” means any incumbent local exchange telephone company or certificated individual or entity, or individual or entity operating pursuant to the approval by the former public service commission of a franchise within § 65-4-207(b), authorized by law to provide, and offering or providing for hire, any telecommunications service, telephone service, telegraph service, paging service, or communications service similar to such services unless otherwise exempted from this definition by state or federal law.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 3059a86; Code 1932, § 5448; Acts 1935, ch. 42, § 1; 1943, ch. 51, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5448; Acts 1979, ch. 195, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-401; Acts 1984, ch. 869, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, §§ 14, 20; 1995, ch. 408, §§ 2, 3; 1999, ch. 317, § 1; 2001, ch. 27, § 1; 2011, ch. 430, §§ 1, 2; 2017, ch. 94, § 51; 2018, ch. 825, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Subdivision designations for the definitions of “public utility” and “telecommunications service provider” in § 65-4-101 were amended by the code commission in 2011. Subdivision (6) was redesignated as subdivision (6)(A); former subdivisions (6)(A)-(I), as present subdivisions (6)(A)(i)-(ix), respectively; former subdivision (7), as (6)(B); and the definition of “telecommunications service provider” as subdivision (7).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in the definition of “public utility”, substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” throughout (A)(vi) and in (B)(i); and, in (A)(vi), substituted “The Tennessee public utility commission's authority” for “The Tennessee regulatory authority's authority” at the beginning and substituted “the commission” for “the authority” near the end of the next to last sentence, and substituted “the utility commission's authority” for “the regulatory authority's authority” in the last sentence.

The 2018 amendment added (C) in the definition of “public utility”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

Cross-References. Municipal gas companies exempt from regulation, § 7-39-311.

Municipal utilities exempt from regulation, §§ 7-34-106, 7-34-117.

Regulation of rates by regulatory authority, title 65, ch. 5.

Utilities district, exemption, § 7-82-104.

Utility location, title 13, ch. 24, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Electricity, § 2; 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, §§ 3, 4; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, §§ 2, 3; 25 Tenn. Juris., Water Companies and Waterworks, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

The Indeterminate Permit for Public Utilities in Tennessee (Henry B. Witham), 6 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1927).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority's power to regulate debt issuance by public utilities engaged in interstate commerce, OAG 99-119, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (5/14/99).

Any proposed classification of political promotional speech as telemarketing or telephone solicitation through redefinition of those terms, within the current consumer protection regulatory scheme, would be constitutionally suspect, OAG 03-011, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (1/24/03).

A telecommunications provider that has been granted a certificate of public convenience and necessity by the Tennessee Regulatory Authority to provide competing access services and transport telecommunications services in Tennessee is entitled to exercise right-of-way and eminent domain powers under Tennessee law. OAG 15-16, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (3/3/2015).

A solar electricity generating facility that comes within the statutory definition of “public electric system” is prohibited from selling power in certain geographical territories. Whether its property is “affected by and dedicated to public use” will depend on a variety of factors, specific to each case. The fact that it provides power “directly and exclusively to owners and/or tenants located on the same or adjacent premises” is just one of many factors to be considered but is not alone determinative of whether or not its property is affected by and dedicated to public use. If the owner of a solar electricity generating facility is a public electric system as defined in T.C.A. § 65-34-102(5), it would likewise be a public utility as defined in T.C.A. § 65-4-101(6)(A) unless it were to come within one of the many statutory exceptions detailed in T.C.A. § 65-4-101(6)(A)(i) through (B)(ii). OAG 17-25, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (4/10/2017).

65-4-102. Railroads excluded.

None of the provisions of this chapter and none of the powers conferred upon the commission shall apply to any railroad, whether operated by an incorporated company or individual, which is operated in this state and which is regulated and governed by chapter 3 of this title.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 3059a86; mod. Code 1932, § 5449; Acts 1939, ch. 130, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5449; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-402; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Monopolies and Restraints of Trade, § 4.

65-4-103. Interstate commerce excepted.

This chapter shall be construed to apply to and affect only public utilities which furnish products or services within the state, and this chapter shall not be construed to extend to any public utility engaged in interstate commerce the government or regulation of which jurisdiction is vested in the interstate commerce commission or other federal board or commission.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 10; Shan. Supp., § 3059a93; Code 1932, § 5456; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-403.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority's power to regulate debt issuance by public utilities engaged in interstate commerce, OAG 99-119, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (5/14/99).

65-4-104. Commission's jurisdiction and control of public utilities.

The commission has general supervisory and regulatory power, jurisdiction, and control over all public utilities, and also over their property, property rights, facilities, and franchises, so far as may be necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. However, such general supervisory and regulatory power and jurisdiction and control shall not apply to street railway companies.

Any investor-owned electric power company serving Tennessee customers on the western side of the Mississippi River shall provide those Tennessee customers with the same level of service and charge the same rates as the power company provides and charges similarly situated customers in Arkansas.

Upon a finding that an investor-owned electric power provider has engaged in unjust or unreasonable discrimination in service or rates in violation of subdivision (b)(1), the commission may order changes in the provider's services or rates to those Tennessee customers as necessary to enforce subdivision (b)(1).

The commission's jurisdiction over an investor-owned electric power company serving Tennessee customers on the western side of the Mississippi River is limited to hearing a complaint alleging a violation of subdivision (b)(1) and granting appropriate relief as provided in subdivision (b)(2).

Nothing in this subsection (b) removes the duty of any investor-owned electric power company to pay any required inspection and supervision fee to the commission as required by part 3 of this chapter.

Nothing in this subsection (b) removes the duty of any investor-owned electric power company to pay its otherwise appropriate Tennessee state or local taxes.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 3059a85; Code 1932, § 5447; Acts 1943, ch. 51, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5447; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-404; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51; 2017, ch. 98, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning rates of investor-owned utility companies, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 98.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by ch. 94 substituted “The commission” for “The authority” at the beginning of (a).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 98 added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 98, § 2. July 1, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Electricity, § 2; 19 Tenn. Juris., Monopolies and Restraints of Trade, § 4; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions § 5.

Law Reviews.

Symposium -- Memphis in the Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

65-4-105. Extent of regulatory power of commission.

In addition to the power conferred by this chapter on the commission, it shall possess with reference to all public utilities within its jurisdiction all the other powers conferred with reference to railroads regulated by the department of transportation or transportation companies regulated by the department of safety as provided by chapters 3 and 5 of this title.

Where any existing contract between any public utility and any municipality specifies that particular things, other than charging certain rates, tolls or fares, shall continue to be done by such public utility, or the nature, kind, and quality of any particular service to be rendered by the public utility to the municipality or its people, nothing in this section nor in this title shall be construed to authorize the commission to excuse such public utility from continuing to do such specified things or from continuing to render and perform the service of at least the nature, kind and quality specified in any such existing contract; but, all these things involving the cost of the service shall be taken into consideration by the commission in exercising its power to pass upon the reasonableness of any rate, fare, or charge hereafter to be made by such public utility.

No provision of this section or of this title shall be construed to alter or impair any existing contract between any public utility and any municipality whereby it has been agreed that any payments of money, in addition to proper ad valorem taxes, shall be made by any such public utility to or for the benefit of any such municipality or its people, but all such things, involving the cost of the service, shall be taken into consideration by the commission in exercising its power to pass upon the reasonableness of any rate, fare or charge hereafter to be made by such public utility.

When any public utility regulated by the commission supplies its services to consumers who use solar or wind-powered equipment as a source of energy, such public utility shall not discriminate against such consumers by its rates, fees or charges or by altering the availability or quality of energy. Any consumer who uses solar, wind power, or other auxiliary source of energy shall install and operate the equipment, property, or appliance for such energy source in compliance with any state or local code or regulation applicable to the safe operation of such equipment, property, or appliance.

Any franchise payment or other payment for the use of public streets, alleys or other public places or any license, privilege, occupation or excise tax payment, which after February 24, 1961, may be made by a utility to a municipality or other political subdivision, except such taxes as are presently provided for under existing statutes and except such franchise payment or other payments as are presently exacted from the utility pursuant to the terms of any existing franchise or other agreement, shall, insofar as practicable, be billed pro rata to the utility customers receiving local service within the municipality or political subdivision receiving such payments, and shall not otherwise be considered by the commission in fixing the rates and charges of the utility.

The commission shall further have jurisdiction over all utility districts created pursuant to Tennessee law, to the extent that the exercise of such jurisdiction is provided by title 7, chapter 82 and Acts 1951, ch. 51 as provided in this chapter or as amended.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 11; Shan. Supp., § 3059a94; Code 1932, § 5457; Acts 1961, ch. 123, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 2; 1980, ch. 756, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-405; Acts 1995, ch. 305, §§ 15, 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Avoiding rate discrimination against solar or wind power users, § 65-5-104.

Municipal public works, discrimination against consumers using auxiliary energy sources, § 7-34-114.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Eugene Puett), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1335 (1961).

65-4-106. Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall not be construed as being in derogation of the common law, but shall be given a liberal construction, and any doubt as to the existence or extent of a power conferred on the commission by this chapter or chapters 1, 3 and 5 of this title shall be resolved in favor of the existence of the power, to the end that the commission may effectively govern and control the public utilities placed under its jurisdiction by this chapter.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 3059a95; Code 1932, § 5458; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-406; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” throughout.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-4-107. Approval of privilege or franchise.

No privilege or franchise hereafter granted to any public utility by the state or by any political subdivision of the state shall be valid until approved by the commission, such approval to be given when, after hearing, the commission determines that such privilege or franchise is necessary and proper for the public convenience and properly conserves the public interest, and the commission shall have power, if it so approves, to impose such conditions as to construction, equipment, maintenance, service or operation as the public convenience and interest may reasonably require; provided, however, that nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as applying to the laying of sidings, sidetracks, or switchouts, by any public utility, and it shall not be necessary for any such public utility to obtain a certificate of convenience from the commission for such purpose.

All terms, conditions, obligations, and rights of a privilege or franchise approved by the commission for the provision of natural gas service shall remain in effect until approval of a subsequent privilege or franchise by the commission.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 3059a90; Code 1932, § 5453; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-407; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2016, ch. 645, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (b).

The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” throughout.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 645, § 4. March 23, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Social Performance of Public Utilities: Effects of Monopoly and Competition, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 308 (1942).

The Indeterminate Permit for Public Utilities in Tennessee (Henry B. Witham), 6 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1927).

65-4-108. Appeal to commission from local regulation.

Any such public utility may appeal to the commission from any order or regulation made by any local, municipal, or county governing body, and the commission is given power and jurisdiction to hear such appeal and to determine the matter in question on the merits and make such order in the premises as may be just and reasonable.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 3059a91; Code 1932, § 5454; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-408; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” twice.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3; 25 Tenn. Juris., Water Companies and Waterworks, § 3.

65-4-109. Issuance of stocks or other evidences of indebtedness.

No public utility shall issue any stocks, stock certificates, bonds, debentures, or other evidences of indebtedness payable in more than one (1) year from the date thereof, until it shall have first obtained authority from the commission for such proposed issue. It shall be the duty of the commission after hearing to approve any such proposed issue maturing more than one (1) year from the date thereof upon being satisfied that the proposed issue, sale and delivery is to be made in accordance with law and the purpose of such be approved by the commission.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 3059a89; Code 1932, § 5452; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-409; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7; 19 Tenn. Juris., Monopolies and Restraints of Trade, § 4.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority's power to regulate debt issuance by public utilities engaged in interstate commerce, OAG 99-119; 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (5/14/99).

Collateral References.

Bond discount, control over issue of securities to capitalize on fund. 72 A.L.R. 1232.

Regulating issuance of securities by public utilities through public service commission. 41 A.L.R. 889.

Street railway companies, public service commission's power as to fiscal management of, and issuance of bonds by. 5 A.L.R. 66, 39 A.L.R. 1517.

65-4-110. Depreciation account for protection of holders of securities.

The commission has the power, after hearing, upon notice, by order in writing, to require every public utility as defined in § 65-4-101 to carry for the protection of stockholders, bondholders or holders of securities a proper and adequate depreciation account in accordance with such rules, regulations, and forms of account, as the commission may prescribe. The commission shall have power to ascertain and determine, and by order in writing, after hearing, fix proper and adequate rates of depreciation of the property of each public utility, and each public utility shall conform its depreciation accounts to the rates so ascertained, determined, and fixed, and shall set aside the moneys so provided for out of earnings and carry the same in a depreciation fund. The income from investments of moneys in such fund shall likewise be carried in such fund. This depreciation fund shall not be expended otherwise than for depreciation, improvements, new constructions, extensions, or additions to the property of such public utility, unless the commission shall by order in writing give permission to the public utility to divert the fund to purposes other than those named in this section.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 3059a88; mod. Code 1932, § 5451; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-410; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “The commission” for “The authority” and “the commission” for “the authority” throughout.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Collateral References.

Natural resources, allowance for depletion in respect of, in fixing rates. 91 A.L.R. 1413.

65-4-111. Uniform system of accounting — Reports.

The commission has the power, after hearing, upon notice, by order in writing, to require every public utility as defined in § 65-4-101 to keep its books, records, and accounts so as to afford an intelligent understanding of the conduct of its business, and to that end to require every such public utility of the same class to adopt a uniform system of accounting. The accounting system shall conform, where applicable, to any system adopted or approved by the interstate commerce commission.

The commission also has the power to require each such utility to furnish annually, or at such other times as the commission may require, a detailed report of finances and operations as shown by such system of accounts.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 3059a88; Code 1932, § 5451; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-411; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “The commission” for “The authority” at the beginning of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-4-112. Utilities leasing, merging, or consolidating property.

No lease of its property, rights, or franchises, by any such public utility, and no merger or consolidation of its property, rights and franchises by any such public utility with the property, rights and franchises of any other such public utility of like character shall be valid until approved by the commission, even though power to take such action has been conferred on such public utility by the state or by any political subdivision of the state.

Any public utility as defined in § 65-4-101, may, without the approval or consent of the state or the commission, or any other agency of the state, sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any of its property, including, but without limitation, franchises, rights, facilities, and other assets, and its capital stock, to any of the nonutilities defined in § 65-4-101.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 3059a89; Code 1932, § 5452; Acts 1935, ch. 42, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5448.1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” in (a) and (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Monopolies and Restraints of Trade, § 4; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3.

65-4-113. Transfer of authority to provide utility services.

No public utility, as defined in § 65-4-101, shall transfer all or any part of its authority to provide utility services, derived from its certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the commission, to any individual, partnership, corporation or other entity without first obtaining the approval of the commission.

Upon petition for approval of the transfer of authority to provide utility services, the commission shall take into consideration all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the suitability, the financial responsibility, and capability of the proposed transferee to perform efficiently the utility services to be transferred and the benefit to the consuming public to be gained from the transfer. The commission shall approve the transfer after consideration of all relevant factors and upon finding that such transfer furthers the public interest.

Following approval of the transfer pursuant to this section, the transferee shall be granted full authority to provide the transferred services subject to the continuing regulation of the commission. The transferor shall no longer have any authority to provide the transferred services, but shall retain authority to provide other services, if any are retained, which were not included in such transfer.

This section shall not apply to any transfers falling under § 65-4-112. This section shall apply to all other utility service transfers, including, but not limited to, the transfer of the authority to provide communications services held by a land line telephone company pursuant to § 65-30-105(h).

To the extent transferees receiving authority under this section would be prohibited from performing the service by § 65-30-104, § 65-30-105(a), or § 65-30-105(f)(2), those sections are declared inapplicable.

Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1; 1994, ch. 545, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-4-113, concerning service requirements, was transferred to § 65-4-114 by Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1, effective Mar. 8, 1993.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” twice in (a) and in the first sentences of (b) and (c); and substituted “The commission” for “The authority” at the beginning of the last sentence in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-4-114. Service requirements.

The commission has the power, after hearing, upon notice, by order in writing, to require every public utility, as defined in § 65-4-101, to:

Furnish safe, adequate, and proper service and to keep and maintain its property and equipment in such condition as to enable it to do so; and

Establish, construct, maintain, and operate any reasonable extension of its existing facilities where, in the judgment of the commission, such extension is reasonable and practicable, and will furnish sufficient business to justify the construction, operation, and maintenance of the same, and when the financial condition of the public utility affected reasonably warrants the original expenditure required in making such extension, or to abandon any service when, in the judgment of the commission, the public welfare no longer requires the same.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 3059a88; Code 1932, § 5451; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-414; Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-4-113; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1956 Tennessee Survey (James B. Earle), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 913 (1956).

65-4-115. Unjust practices and unsafe services prohibited.

No public utility shall adopt, maintain, or enforce any regulation, practice, or measurement which is unjust, unreasonable, unduly preferential or discriminatory, nor shall any public utility provide or maintain any service that is unsafe, improper, or inadequate, or withhold or refuse any service which can reasonably be demanded and furnished when ordered by the commission.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 3059a89; Code 1932, § 5452; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-422; Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-4-114; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-4-115, concerning penalties for violations of this chapter, was transferred to § 65-4-116 by Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1, effective Mar. 8, 1993.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” at the end of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Monopolies and Restraints of Trade, § 4.

65-4-116. Penalties.

The penalties prescribed by chapter 3 of this title shall be and remain in full force and effect, and shall in every case apply to any public utility within this chapter in the same manner and to the same extent as they are made applicable to and imposed on railroad and transportation companies under chapter 3 of this title.

In determining the amount of the penalty, the appropriateness of the penalty to the size of the business of the person, firm or corporation charged, the gravity of the violation and the good faith of the person, firm or corporation charged in attempting to achieve compliance, after notification of a violation, shall be considered. The amount of the penalty, when finally determined, may be deducted from any sums owing by the state to the person, firm or corporation charged or may be recovered in a civil action in the courts of this state.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 9; Shan. Supp., § 3059a92; Code 1932, § 5455; Acts 1969, ch. 156, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-423; Acts 1991, ch. 439, §§ 3, 4; 1993, ch. 23, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-4-115.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-4-116, concerning the former commission's regulatory powers, was transferred to § 65-4-117 by Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1, effective Mar. 8, 1993.